Washington statutes.
RCW 13.50.140

Disclosure of privileged information to office of the family and children's ombuds—Privilege not waived as to others.

Any communication or advice privileged under RCW 5.60.060 that is disclosed by the office of the attorney general, the department of children, youth, and families, or the department of social and health services to the office of the family and children's ombuds may not be deemed to be a waiver of the privilege as to others.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 314; 2013 c 23 s 8; 1999 c 390 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.